New Jersey, session 222, S1580.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall: (1) continue to issue: (a) one-way tickets for rail passenger service, including light-rail service, and motorbus regular route service bearing no expiration date; and (b) 10-trip tickets for rail passenger service bearing no expiration date; and (2) permit individuals who have previously purchased a ticket for rail passenger service, including light-rail service, or motorbus regular route service bearing no expiration date, regardless of the date of purchase, to utilize the unused ticket for rail passenger service, including light-rail service, or motorbus regular route service, as applicable. b.  Within 90 days of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the corporation shall reinstate any ticket for rail passenger service, including light-rail service, or motorbus regular route service issued by the corporation that bears no expiration date and that expired as a result of a corporation policy implemented by the corporation prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.